North Dakota, session 69, HB1310.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 12.1-32-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
12.1-32-02. Sentencing alternatives - Credit for time in custody - Diagnostic testing.
1. Every person convicted of an offense who is sentenced by the court must be
sentenced to one or a combination of the following alternatives, unless the sentencing
alternatives are otherwise specifically provided in the statute defining the offense or
sentencing is deferred under subsection 4:
a. Payment of the reasonable costs of the person's prosecution.
b. Probation.
c.b. A term of imprisonment, including intermittent imprisonment:
Page No. 1 25.0105.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
(1) In a state correctional facility in accordance with section 29-27-07, in a
regional corrections center, or in a county jail, if convicted of a felony or a
class A misdemeanor.
(2) In a county jail or in a regional corrections center, if convicted of a class B
misdemeanor.
(3) In a facility or program deemed appropriate for the treatment of the
individual offender, including available community-based or faith-based
programs.
(4) In the case of persons convicted of an offense who are under eighteen
years of age at the time of sentencing, the court is limited to sentencing the
minor defendant to a term of imprisonment in the custody of the department
of corrections and rehabilitation.
d.c. A fine.
e.d. Restitution for damages resulting from the commission of the offense.
f.e. Restoration of damaged property or other appropriate work detail.
g.f. Commitment to an appropriate licensed public or private institution for treatment
of alcoholism, drug addiction, or mental disease or defect.
h.g. Commitment to a sexual offender treatment program.
i.h. Drug court program. A drug court is a district court supervised treatment program
approved by the supreme court which combines judicial supervision with alcohol
and drug testing and substance use disorder treatment in a licensed treatment
program. The supreme court may adopt rules, including rules of procedure, for
drug court programs.
j.i. Veterans treatment docket. A veterans treatment docket is a district court
supervised docket approved by the supreme court which combines judicial
supervision with licensed treatment programs to treat substance use disorders,
mental health conditions, behavioral health conditions, traumatic brain injuries,
military sexual trauma, and co-occurring disorders. The supreme court may adopt
rules, including rules of procedure, for veterans treatment dockets.
k.j. Completion of a restorative justice program. For purposes of this section,
"restorative justice program" means a system of justice which focuses on the
Page No. 2 25.0105.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
rehabilitation of offenders through reconciliation with victims and the community
at large.
l.k. Mental health court program. A mental health court is a district court supervised
treatment program approved by the supreme court which combines judicial
supervision with mental health services and treatment in a licensed treatment
program. The supreme court may adopt rules, including rules of procedure, for
mental health court programs.
Except as provided by section 12.1-32-06.1, sentences imposed under this subsection
may not exceed in duration the maximum sentences of imprisonment provided by
section 12.1-32-01, section 12.1-32-09, or as provided specifically in a statute defining
an offense. This subsection does not permit the unconditional discharge of an offender
following conviction. A sentence under subdivision d or e or f must be imposed in the
manner provided in section 12.1-32-08. If the person is sentenced to a term of
imprisonment, the court may prohibit the person from contacting the victim during the
term of imprisonment. For purposes of this subsection, "victim" means victim as
defined in section 12.1-34-01.
2. Credit against any sentence to a term of imprisonment must be given by the court to a
defendant for all time spent in custody as a result of the criminal charge for which the
sentence was imposed or as a result of the conduct on which such charge was based.
"Time spent in custody" includes time spent in custody in a jail or mental institution for
the offense charged, whether that time is spent prior tobefore trial, during trial, pending
sentence, or pending appeal. The total amount of credit the defendant is entitled to for
time spent in custody and any credit for sentence reduction under section 12-44.1-32
or 12-54.1-01 the defendant is entitled to must be stated in the criminal judgment.
3. A court may suspend the execution of all or a part of the sentence imposed. The court
shall place the defendant on probation during the term of suspension.
4. A court, upon application or its own motion, may defer imposition of sentence. The
court must place the defendant on probation during the period of deferment. An order
deferring imposition of sentence is reviewable upon appeal from a verdict or judgment.
In any subsequent prosecution, for any other offense, the prior conviction for which
imposition of sentence is deferred may be pleaded and proved, and has the same
Page No. 3 25.0105.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
effect as if probation had not been granted or the information or indictment dismissed
under section 12.1-32-07.1.
5. A court may, prior tobefore imposition of sentence, order the convicted offender
committed to an appropriate licensed public or private institution for diagnostic testing
for such period of time as may be necessary, but not to exceed thirty days. The court
may, by subsequent order, extend the period of commitment for not to exceed thirty
additional days. The court may also order such diagnostic testing without ordering
commitment to an institution. Validity of a sentence must not be challenged on the
ground that diagnostic testing was not performed pursuant to this subsection.
6. All sentences imposed must be accompanied by a written statement by the court
setting forth the reasons for imposing the particular sentence. The statement must
become part of the record of the case.
7. If an offender is sentenced to a term of imprisonment, that term of imprisonment
commences at the time of sentencing, unless, upon motion of the defendant, the court
orders the term to commence at some other time.
8. Unless otherwise specifically authorized in the statute defining the offense, a court
may not include a minimum term of imprisonment as part of its sentence.
9. A person who is convicted of a felony and sentenced to imprisonment for not more
than three hundred sixty days is deemed to have been convicted of a misdemeanor.
However, if an order is entered revoking a term of probation that was imposed as part
of a sentence, the person is deemed to have been convicted of a felony.
10. A court shall order a defendant to pay fifty dollars to the department of corrections and
rehabilitation at the time a presentence investigation is initiated to partially defray the
costs incurred by the department for the preparation of the presentence report. The
court may also order that any additional costs incurred by the department relating to
the presentence investigation and report be paid by the defendant at a rate of
payment up to the full costs of conducting the investigation and preparing the report as
established by the department.
11. Before sentencing a defendant on a felony charge under section 12.1-20-03,
12.1-20-03.1, 12.1-20-11, 12.1-27.2-02, 12.1-27.2-03, 12.1-27.2-04, or 12.1-27.2-05, a
court shall order the department of corrections and rehabilitation to conduct a
Page No. 4 25.0105.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
presentence investigation and to prepare a presentence report. A presentence
investigation for a charge under section 12.1-20-03 must include a risk assessment. A
court may order the inclusion of a risk assessment in any presentence investigation. In
all felony or class A misdemeanor offenses, in which force, as defined in section
12.1-01-04, or threat of force is an element of the offense or in violation of section
12.1-22-02, or an attempt to commit the offenses, a court, unless a presentence
investigation has been ordered, must receive a criminal record report before the
sentencing of the defendant. Unless otherwise ordered by the court, the criminal
record report must be conducted by the department of corrections and rehabilitation
after consulting with the prosecuting attorney regarding the defendant's criminal
record. The criminal record report must be in writing, filed with the court before
sentencing, and made a part of the court's record of the sentencing proceeding.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 12.1-32-07 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
2. The conditions of probation must be such as the court in its discretion deems
reasonably necessary to ensure that the defendant will lead a law-abiding life or to
assist the defendant to do so. The court shall provide as an explicit condition of every
probation that the defendant not commit another offense during the period for which
the probation remains subject to revocation. The court shall order supervision costs
and fees of not less than fifty-five dollars per month unless the court makes a specific
finding on record that the imposition of fees will result in an undue hardship. If the
offender has not paid the full amount of supervision fees and costs before completion
or termination of probation, the court may issue an order, after opportunity for hearing,
to determine the amount of supervision fees and costs that are unpaid. The order may
be filed, transcribed, and enforced by the department of corrections and rehabilitation
in the same manner as civil judgments rendered by a district court of this state.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Subsection 4 of section 12.1-32-07 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
4. When imposing a sentence to probation, probation in conjunction with imprisonment,
or probation in conjunction with suspended execution or deferred imposition of
Page No. 5 25.0105.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
sentence, the court may impose such conditions as it deems appropriate and may
include any one or more of the following:
a. Work faithfully at a suitable employment or faithfully pursue a course of study or
of career and technical education training that will equip the defendant for
suitable employment.
b. Undergo available medical or psychiatric treatment and remain in a specified
institution if required for that purpose.
c. Attend or reside in a facility established for the instruction, recreation, or
residence of persons on probation.
d. Support the defendant's dependents and meet other family responsibilities.
e. Make restitution or reparation to the victim of the defendant's conduct for the
damage or injury which was sustained or perform other reasonable assigned
work. When restitution, reparation, or assigned work is a condition of probation,
the court shall proceed as provided in subsection 1 or 2, as applicable, of section
12.1-32-08.
f. Pay a fine imposed after consideration of the provisions of section 12.1-32-05.
g. Refrain from excessive use of alcohol or any use of narcotics or of another
dangerous or abusable drug without a prescription.
h. Permit the probation officer to visit the defendant at reasonable times at the
defendant's home or elsewhere.
i. Remain within the jurisdiction of the court, unless granted permission to leave by
the court or the probation officer.
j. Answer all reasonable inquiries by the probation officer and promptly notify the
probation officer of any change in address or employment.
k. Report to a probation officer at reasonable times as directed by the court or the
probation officer.
l. Submit to a medical examination or other reasonable testing for the purpose of
determining the defendant's use of narcotics, marijuana, or other controlled
substance whenever required by a probation officer.
m. Refrain from associating with known users or traffickers in narcotics, marijuana,
or other controlled substances.
Page No. 6 25.0105.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
n. Submit the defendant's person, place of residence, or vehicle to search and
seizure by a probation officer at any time of the day or night, with or without a
search warrant.
o. Serve a term of imprisonment of up to one-half of the maximum term authorized
for the offense of which the defendant was convicted.
p. Reimburse the costs and expenses determined necessary for the defendant's
adequate defense when counsel is appointed or provided at public expense for
the defendant. When reimbursement of indigent defense costs and expenses is
imposed as a condition of probation, the court shall proceed as provided in
subsection 4 of section 12.1-32-08.
q. Provide community service for the number of hours designated by the court.
r.q. Refrain from any subscription to, access to, or use of the internet.
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. Section 12.1-32-08 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
12.1-32-08. Hearing prior tobefore ordering restitution, or reparation, or
reimbursement of indigent defense costs and expenses - Conditions - Collection of
restitution for insufficient funds checks - Continuing appropriation.
1. The court, when sentencing a person adjudged guilty of criminal activities that have
resulted in pecuniary damages, in addition to any other sentence the court may
impose, shall order that the defendant make restitution to the victim or other recipient
as determined by the court. Restitution must include payment to the owner of real
property that is contaminated by the defendant in the manufacturing of
methamphetamine for the cost of removing the contamination and returning the
property to the property's condition before contamination and to any other person that
has incurred costs in decontaminating the property.
2. If the court has retained jurisdiction after the sentencing hearing for claims of
restitution, to make a claim for restitution, the victim shall submit information by
affidavit or declaration and, as applicable, documentary evidence within the time
specified in the order. The information submitted must describe the items or elements
of loss, itemize the total dollar amounts of restitution claimed, and present facts and
evidence sufficient to support a finding the restitution is directly related to the offense
Page No. 7 25.0105.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
and the amount awarded. The prosecutor shall serve the defendant with a copy of the
information submitted by the victim no later than sixty days following sentencing.
3. The defendant may challenge restitution but must do so by requesting a hearing within
thirty days of being served with the written notification of the amount of restitution
requested. The hearing request must be made in writing and filed with the court. If no
hearing is requested, the court may enter a judgment ordering restitution. A defendant
may not challenge restitution after the thirty-day time period has passed.
4. In determining the amount of restitution, the court shall take into account the
reasonable damages sustained by the victim or victims of the criminal offense, which
damages are limited to those directly related to the criminal offense and expenses
actually sustained as a direct result of the defendant's criminal action. This can include
an amount equal to the cost of necessary and related professional services and
devices relating to physical, psychiatric, and psychological care. The defendant may
be required as part of the sentence imposed by the court to pay the prescribed
treatment costs for a victim of a sexual offense as defined in chapters 12.1-20 and
12.1-27.2. The court shall fix the amount of restitution or reparation and shall fix the
manner of performance of any condition or conditions of probation established
pursuant to this subsection. The court may order the defendant to disclose income and
assets on forms developed by the state court administrator to facilitate the setting of
an appropriate payment plan. The court shall order restitution be paid to the division of
adult services for any benefits the division has paid or may pay to the victim under
chapter 54-23.4 unless the court, on the record, directs otherwise. Any payments
made pursuant to the order must be deducted from damages awarded in a civil action
arising from the same incident.
5. An order that a defendant make restitution or reparation as a sentence or condition of
probation, unless the court directs otherwise, may be filed without filing fee,
transcribed, and enforced by the person entitled to the restitution or reparation or by
the division of adult services in the same manner as civil judgments rendered by the
courts of this state may be enforced. Upon thirty days' written notice to the victim's last
known address, the court may order the judgment imposing a duty to pay restitution or
Page No. 8 25.0105.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
reparation be docketed in the same manner as a civil judgment under section
29-26-22.1.
6. When the restitution ordered by the court under subsection 1 is the result of a finding
that the defendant issued a check or draft without sufficient funds or without an
account, the court shall impose as costs the greater of the sum of ten dollars or an
amount equal to twenty-five percent of the amount of restitution ordered. The costs
imposed under this subsection, however, may not exceed one thousand dollars. The
state-employed clerks of district court shall remit the funds collected as costs under
this subsection to the state treasurer for deposit in the restitution collection assistance
fund. The funds deposited into the restitution collection assistance fund are
appropriated to the judicial branch on a continuing basis for the purpose of defraying
expenses incident to the collection of restitution, including operating expenses and the
compensation of additional necessary personnel. The state's attorneys and
county-employed clerks of district court shall remit the funds collected as costs under
this subsection to the county treasurer to be deposited in the county general fund.
7. The court may order the defendant to perform reasonable assigned work as a
condition of probation, which assigned work need not be related to the offense
charged, but must not be solely for the benefit of a private individual other than the
victim.
8. Under section 12.1-32-07, the court may order that the defendant reimburse indigent
defense costs and expenses as a condition of probation.
a. Unless it finds that there is no likelihood that the defendant is or will be able to
pay attorney's fees and expenses, the court, in its judgment of conviction, and in
any order or amended judgment following a revocation or other postjudgment
proceeding, shall notify the defendant, the defendant's probation officer, and the
prosecuting attorney of the presumed amount of costs and expenses to be
reimbursed, as determined by the commission on legal counsel for indigents, and
of the right to a hearing on the reimbursement amount. The reimbursement
amount must include an application fee imposed under section 29-07-01.1 if the
fee has not been paid before disposition of the case and the court has not waived
payment of the fee.
Page No. 9 25.0105.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
b. If the defendant or prosecutor requests a hearing within thirty days of receiving
notice under this subdivision, the court shall schedule a hearing at which the
actual amount of attorney's fees and expenses must be shown. In determining
the amount and method of reimbursement, the court shall consider the financial
resources of the defendant and the nature of the burden that reimbursement of
costs and expenses will impose.
c. A defendant who is required to reimburse indigent defense costs and expenses
as a condition of probation and who is not willfully in default in that
reimbursement may at any time petition the court that imposed the condition to
waive reimbursement of all or any portion of the costs and expenses. If the court
is satisfied that reimbursement of the amount due will impose undue hardship on
the defendant or the defendant's immediate family, the court may waive
reimbursement of all or any portion of the amount due or modify the method of
payment.
d. If at any time the court finds that the defendant is able to reimburse costs and
expenses and has willfully failed to do so, the court may continue, modify, or
enlarge the conditions of probation or revoke probation as provided in
subsection 6 or 7, as applicable, of section 12.1-32-07.
9. If the court finds that the defendant is unable to pay a fine, supervision fee,
reimbursement for indigent defense costs and expenses, or restitution or reparations,
the court may order the defendant to perform reasonable assigned work in lieu of all or
part of a fine, a supervision fee, reimbursement for indigent defense costs and
expenses, or restitution or reparations. The defendant may not perform reasonable
assigned work in lieu of restitution or reparations unless the person entitled to
restitution or reparations has consented in writing or on the record.
SECTION 5. AMENDMENT. Section 29-07-01.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
Page No. 10 25.0105.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
29-07-01.1. Payment of expenses for defense of indigents - Reimbursement of
indigent defense costs and expenses - Indigent defense administration fund - Continuing
appropriation.
1. Lawyers provided to represent indigent persons must be compensated at a
reasonable rate to be determined by the commission on legal counsel for indigents.
Expenses necessary for the adequate defense of an indigent person prosecuted in
district court, other than for a violation of a home rule county's ordinance, when
approved by the commission, must be paid by the state. Expenses necessary for the
adequate defense of an indigent person prosecuted for violation of a home rule
county's ordinance must be paid by the home rule county. Expenses necessary for the
adequate defense of an indigent person prosecuted in municipal court, when approved
by the judge, must be paid by the city in which the alleged offense took place. The city
shall also pay the expenses in any matter transferred to district court pursuant to
section 40-18-06.2 or 40-18-15.1, in any appeal taken to district court from a judgment
of conviction in municipal court pursuant to section 40-18-19, and in an appeal or
postconviction matter seeking relief from a conviction resulting from violation of a
municipal ordinance. A defendant requesting representation by counsel at public
expense, or for whom counsel provided at public expense without a request is
considered appropriate by the court, shall submit an application for indigent defense
services. For an application for indigent defense services in the district court, a
nonrefundable application fee of thirty-five dollars must be paid at the time the
application is submitted. The district court may extend the time for payment of the fee
or may waive or reduce the fee if the court determines the defendant is financially
unable to pay all or part of the fee. If the application fee is not paid before disposition
of the case, the fee amount must be added to the amount to be reimbursed under this
section. Application fees collected under this subsection must be forwarded for deposit
in the indigent defense administration fund established under subsection 4.
2. A defendant for whom counsel is provided at public expense, subject to this
subsection, shall reimburse the state, home rule county, or city such sums as the
state, home rule county, or city expends on the defendant's behalf.
Page No. 11 25.0105.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
a. At the time counsel is provided for a defendant, the court shall advise the
defendant of the defendant's potential obligation to reimburse the appropriate
governmental entity the amounts expended on behalf of the defendant.
b. Unless it finds that there is no likelihood that the defendant is or will be able to
pay attorney's fees and expenses, the court, in its judgment of conviction, and in
any order or amended judgment entered following a revocation or other
postjudgment proceeding, shall order the defendant to reimburse the presumed
amount of indigent defense costs and expenses, as determined by the
commission, and shall notify the defendant of the right to a hearing on the
reimbursement amount. If the defendant or prosecutor requests a hearing within
thirty days of receiving notice under this subdivision, the court shall schedule a
hearing at which the actual amount of attorney's fees and expenses must be
shown. In determining the amount of reimbursement and method of payment, the
court shall consider the financial resources of the defendant and the nature of the
burden that reimbursement of costs and expenses will impose.
c. A defendant who is required to reimburse indigent defense costs and expenses
and who is not willfully in default in that reimbursement may at any time petition
the court to waive reimbursement of all or any portion of the attorney's fees and
expenses. If the court is satisfied that reimbursement of the amount due will
impose undue hardship on the defendant or the defendant's immediate family,
the court may waive reimbursement of all or any portion of the amount due or
modify the method of payment.
3. The attorney general, the state's attorney of the home rule county, or the prosecuting
attorney of the city in which the alleged offense took place, if reimbursement has not
been received, shall seek civil recovery of any amounts expended on the defendant's
behalf anytime the attorney general, state's attorney, or city attorney determines the
person for whom counsel was appointed may have funds to repay the state, home rule
county, or city within six years of the date such amount was paid on that person's
behalf. A person against whom civil recovery is sought under this subsection is entitled
to all exemptions accorded to other judgment debtors. The attorney general, state's
attorney, or prosecuting attorney may contract with a private sector collection agency
Page No. 12 25.0105.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
for assistance in seeking recovery of such funds. Before referring the matter to a
collection agency, the state's attorney shall notify the person who is the subject of the
collection action.
4. The indigent defense administration fund is a special fund in the state treasury. The
state treasurer shall deposit in the fund all application fees collected under
subsection 1. All moneys in the indigent defense administration fund are appropriated
on a continuing basis to the commission on legal counsel for indigents to be used in
the administration of the indigent defense system.
SECTION 6. AMENDMENT. Section 29-26-22 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
29-26-22. Judgment for fines - Court administration fee - Community service
supervision fee - Special funds - Docketing and enforcementCourt fines and costs
waived for completing drug court program. (Retroactive application - See note)
1. In all criminal cases except infractions, upon a plea or finding of guilt, the court shall
impose a court administration fee in lieu of the assessment of court costs. The court
administration fee must include a fee of one hundred twenty-five dollars for a class B
misdemeanor, two hundred dollars for a class A misdemeanor, four hundred dollars for
a class C felony, six hundred fifty dollars for a class B felony, and nine hundred dollars
for a class A or AA felony.
2. In addition, in all criminal cases except infractions, the court administration fee must
include one hundred dollars. Of the additional one hundred dollar court administration
fee, the first seven hundred fifty thousand dollars collected per biennium must be
deposited in the indigent defense administration fund, which must be used for indigent
defense services in this state, and the next four hundred sixty thousand dollars
collected per biennium must be deposited in the court facilities improvement and
maintenance fund. After the minimum thresholds have been collected, one-half of the
additional court administration fee must be deposited in each fund.
3. In addition to any court administration fees that may be imposed under subsections 1
and 2, the court shall impose upon each defendant who receives a sentence that
includes community service a community service supervision fee of twenty-five dollars.
The community service supervision fee must be deposited in the community service
Page No. 13 25.0105.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
supervision fund. The fees deposited in this fund must be used to provide community
service supervision grants subject to legislative appropriations.
4. A court may waive the administration fee or community service supervision fee upon a
showing of indigency as provided in section 25-03.1-13. District court administration
fees, exclusive of amounts deposited in the indigent defense administration fund and
the court facilities and improvement fund, and forfeitures must be deposited in the
state general fund. A judgment that the defendant pay a fine or fees, or both, may be
docketed and if docketed constitutes a lien upon the real estate of the defendant in
like manner as a judgment for money rendered in a civil action. The court may allow
the defendant to pay any assessed administration fee or community service
supervision fee in installments. When a defendant is assessed administration fees or a
community service supervision fee, the court may not impose at the same time an
alternative sentence to be served if the fees are not paid.
5. Upon successful completion of an approved adult drug court program, a court may
waive all unpaid fines, fees, and costs imposed in the criminal judgment sentencing the
defendant to the drug court program, except for restitution. For purposes of this
subsectionsection, "approved drug court program" means a district court-supervised treatment
program approved by the supreme court.
SECTION 7. AMENDMENT. Subdivision h of subsection 5 of section 39-08-01 of the North
Dakota Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
h. If the penalty mandated by this section includes imprisonment or placement upon
conviction of a violation of this section or equivalent ordinance, and if an
addiction evaluation has indicated that the defendant needs treatment, the court
may order the defendant to undergo treatment at an appropriate licensed
addiction treatment program under subdivision gf of subsection 1 of section
12.1-32-02 and the time spent by the defendant in the treatment must be credited
as a portion of a sentence of imprisonment or placement under this section. A
court may not order the department of corrections and rehabilitation to be
responsible for the costs of treatment in a private treatment facility.
SECTION 8. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 54-12-14 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
Page No. 14 25.0105.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
1. The attorney general assets forfeiture fund consists of funds appropriated by the
legislative assembly and additional funds obtained from moneys, assets, and
proceeds seized and forfeited pursuant to section 19-03.1-36, amounts received
through court proceedings as restitution, amounts remaining from the forfeiture of
property after the payment of expenses for forfeiture and sale authorized by law, and
amounts received from a multijurisdictional drug task force as defined in section
54-12-26. The amount of deposits into the fund which do not come from legislative
appropriation or from a multijurisdictional drug task force and are not payable to
another governmental entity may not exceed two hundred thousand dollars within a
biennium and any moneys in excess of that amount must be deposited in the general
fund. The funds are appropriated, as a standing and continuing appropriation, to the
attorney general for the following purposes:
a. For obtaining evidence for enforcement of any state criminal law or law relating to
the control of drug abuse.
b. For repayment of rewards to qualified local programs approved under section
12.1-32-02.2, if the information that was reported to the qualified local program
substantially contributed to forfeiture of the asset, and forFor paying, at the
discretion of the attorney general, rewards for other information or assistance
leading to a forfeiture under section 19-03.1-36.
c. For paying, at the discretion of the attorney general, any expenses necessary to
seize, detain, inventory, safeguard, maintain, advertise, or sell property seized,
detained, or forfeited pursuant to section 19-03.1-36, or of any other necessary
expenses incident to the seizure, detention, or forfeiture of such property.
d. For equipping, for law enforcement functions, forfeited vessels, vehicles, and
aircraft retained as provided by law for official use by the state board of pharmacy
or a law enforcement agency.
e. For paying, at the discretion of the attorney general, overtime compensation to
agents of the bureau of criminal investigation incurred as a result of
investigations of violations of any state criminal law or law relating to the control
of drug abuse.
Page No. 15 25.0105.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
f. For paying matching funds required to be paid as a condition for receipt of funds
from a federal government program awarding monetary grants or assistance for
the investigation, apprehension, or prosecution of persons violating the
provisions of chapter 19-03.1.
SECTION 9. AMENDMENT. Subsection 16 of section 54-23.3-04 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
16. To collect the costs of any presentence investigation and report incurred under
subsection 1110 of section 12.1-32-02, giving due consideration to the financial
obligations and resources of the defendant.
SECTION 10. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 62.1-05-01 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
2. A person who violates this section is guilty of a class C felony. Upon arrest of that
person, the firearm or dangerous weapon must be seized. Upon conviction of the
person and motion to the court in which the conviction occurred, the firearm or
dangerous weapon must be forfeited to the jurisdiction in which the arrest was made.
The firearm or dangerous weapon may be sold at public auction, retained for use, or
destroyed pursuant to the court's order. If a qualified local program as defined under
section 12.1-32-02.2 has paid a reward for information that resulted in forfeiture of the
item and the item has been sold, the jurisdiction shall, after payment of expenses for
forfeiture and sale, repay the qualified local program for the reward that it has paid.
SECTION 11. REPEAL. Sections 12.1-32-02.2, 27-01-10, 27-05.2-08, 27-05.2-09, and
27-05.2-10 of the North Dakota Century Code are repealed.
SECTION 12. APPLICATION. This Act applies to a court order or any criminal sentencing
imposed after the effective date of this Act.
Page No. 16 25.0105.01000